New York, session 2025-2026, S4739.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 10 of section 1692 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law is renumbered subdivision 11 and a new subdivision 10 is added to 3 read as follows: 4 10. No TNC user agreement shall contain a mandatory arbitration clause 5 for certain offenses including matters of assault pursuant to article 6 one hundred twenty of the penal law or sexual offenses pursuant to arti- 7 cle one hundred thirty of the penal law. Any user agreement issued 8 prior to the effective date of this subdivision containing such clause 9 shall be considered null and void and new user agreements without such 10 clause shall be issued to such users within fourteen days of the effec- 11 tive date of this subdivision. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09460-01-5